Washington statutes.
RCW 9.73.020

Opening sealed letter.

Every person who shall wilfully open or read, or cause to be opened or read, any sealed message, letter or telegram intended for another person, or publish the whole or any portion of such a message, letter or telegram, knowing it to have been opened or read without authority, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1909 c 249 s 411; RRS s 2663.]